Hawaii statutes.
§235-30 Apportionment; property factor.
The property factor is a fraction, the numerator of which is the average value
of the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property owned or rented and used
in this State during the tax period and the denominator of which is the average
value of all the taxpayer's real and tangible personal property owned or rented
and used during the tax period. [L 1967, c 33, pt of §1; HRS §235-30]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next